District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Extension of Substance Use and Targeted Outreach Grants Temporary
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 5120e of the Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013,
effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.01 et seq.), is
amended by adding a new subsection (g) to read as follows:
“(g)(1) Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, and subject to available funds,
the Department shall issue grants in Fiscal Year 2027 to the organizations that received grants
(“grantees”) in Fiscal Year 2026 pursuant to the Substance Use and Behavioral Health Services
Targeted Outreach Grant Act of 2025, effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; Note at
D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.01), for the purposes of continuing services at the locations where
the grantees operated in Fiscal Year 2026.


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
“(2) The Department may issue grant awards for services at additional locations.”.
“(g)(1) Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, and subject to the availability of
funds, the Department shall issue grants in Fiscal Year 2027 to the organizations that received
grants in Fiscal Year 2026 pursuant to the Substance Use and Behavioral Health Services
Targeted Outreach Grant Act of 2025, effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; 73 DCR
00001) (“grantees”), for the purpose of continuing to provide direct support, relationship
development, and resource brokering to individuals in need of substance use and behavioral
health services at the following locations:
“(A) The vicinity and related geography of the 600 block of T Street, NW
in Wards 1 and 2;
“(B) The vicinity and related geography of the 1300-1700 blocks of North
Capitol Street, 2566 NW, and 1600-1700 blocks of Lincoln, Road, NE in Ward 5;
“(C) The vicinity and related geography of the King Greenleaf Recreation
Center, located at 2571 201 N Street, SW in Ward 6;
“(D) Ward 1 Community Navigator sites at the following locations:
“(i) Columbia Heights Civil Plaza;
“(ii) The intersection of Mount Pleasant Street, NW, and Kenyon
Street, NW;
“(iii) Georgia Avenue, NW, between New Hampshire Avenue,
NW, and Harvard Street, NW; and


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
“(iv) U Street, NW, between 14th Street, NW, and Georgia
Avenue, NW.”.
“(2) The Department may issue grant awards for services at additional locations.”.
Sec. 3. Section 5012 of the Opioid Abatement Fund Establishment Act of 2022 (D.C.
Law 24-315; D.C. Official Code § 7–3221) is amended by inserting a new sub-section (b-7) to
read as follows:
“(b-7) Before Fiscal Year 2026 grant agreements expire, the Department of Behavioral
Health (DBH) shall fully extend all Fiscal Year 2026 grantee organizations’ awards to continue
implementation of the Substance Use and Behavioral Health Services Targeted Outreach Grant
Act of 2025 pilot program, in order to avoid disruption of services. This requirement applies
regardless of whether new Fiscal Year 2027 grant awards for additional locations are made by
the agency under D.C. Law 26-0142, the Place-Based Substance Use Disorder Outreach
Amendment Act of 2026, A26-0320, effective from Jul 18, 2026).
“(1) The funding shall be extended for all current grantees currently operating at
the following locations:
“(A) The vicinity and related geography of the 600 block of T Street,
NW in Wards 1 and 2;
“(B) The vicinity and related geography of the 1300-1700 blocks of North
Capitol Street, 2566 NW, and 1600-1700 blocks of Lincoln, Road, NE in Ward 5;


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
“(C) The vicinity and related geography of the King Greenleaf Recreation
Center, located at 2571 201 N Street, SW in Ward 6; and
“(D) Ward 1 Community Navigator sites at the following locations:
“(i) Columbia Heights Civil Plaza;
“(ii) The intersection of Mount Pleasant Street, NW, and Kenyon
Street, NW;
“(iii) Georgia Avenue, NW, between New Hampshire Avenue,
NW, and Harvard Street, NW; and
“(iv) U Street, NW, between 14th Street, NW, and Georgia
Avenue, NW.”.
“(b-8) In Fiscal Year 2027 and subject to funding available in the Fund, the Fund shall be
used to reissue grants to all Fiscal Year 2026 grantee organizations awarded grants pursuant to
the Substance Use and Behavioral Health Services Targeted Outreach Grant Act of 2025,
effective December 6, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-55; Note at D.C. Official Code § 7-1141.01), for the
purposes described in section 5120e(g)(1) of the Department of Behavioral Health Establishment
Act of 2013, effective July 18, 2026 (D.C. Law 26-142; D.C. Official Code § 7-1143.02(g)(1)).”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.